Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2016, chapter 189, article 7, section 46, the effective date, as amended by Laws 2017, chapter 94, article 6, section 20, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This sectiondeleted text begin , except for subdivision 4, is effective July 1, 2016, and expires June 30, 2018. Subdivision 4deleted text end is effective July 1, 2016, and expires on the date the last loan is repaid or forgiven as provided under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from June 30, 2018. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin MILLE LACS LOAN FORGIVENESS.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Laws 2016, chapter 189, article 7, section 46, subdivision 2, the commissioner of employment and economic development must request that Mille Lacs County forgive all outstanding loans issued under Minnesota Laws 2016, chapter 189, article 7, section 46. The commissioner shall modify as necessary any terms of the grant to Mille Lacs County that was made under that section. new text end